test/src/morphology/A-sininen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ihminen - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'menneske' - ei tsekattu
     sininen+A+Sg+Nom: sininen
     sininen+A+Sg+Gen: sinisen
     sininen+A+Sg+Par: sinistä
     sininen+A+Sg+Tra: siniseksi
     sininen+A+Sg+Abe: sinisettä
     sininen+A+Sg+Ine: sinisessä
     sininen+A+Sg+Ela: sinisestä
     sininen+A+Sg+Ill: sinisheen
     sininen+A+Sg+Ade: sinisellä
     sininen+A+Sg+Abl: siniseltä
     sininen+A+Sg+All: siniselle
     sininen+A+Sg+Ess: sinisennä
     sininen+A+Pl+Nom: siniset
     sininen+A+Pl+Gen: sinisten
     sininen+A+Pl+Par: sinissii
     sininen+A+Pl+Tra: sinisiksi
     sininen+A+Pl+Abe: sinisittä
     sininen+A+Pl+Ine: sinisissä
     sininen+A+Pl+Ela: sinisistä
     sininen+A+Pl+Ill: sinisshiin
     sininen+A+Pl+Ade: sinisillä
     sininen+A+Pl+Abl: sinisiltä
     sininen+A+Pl+All: sinisille
     sininen+A+Pl+Ess: sinisinnä
     sininen+A+Pl+Com: sinisine
